California, session 20252026, SB1257.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 7284.9 is added to the Government Code, to read:7284.9.SECTION 1. Section 11012 is added to the Penal Code, to read:11012. (a) On or before October 30, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Attorney General shall submit to the Legislature, and post on its internet website, a report that includes all of the following:(1) A summary of all immigration enforcement incidents and activities occurring on or after September 1, 2025, conducted by a person at a designated safe location that have been reported by the designated safe location or a person who witnessed the activity to the Attorney General, including, but not limited to, reports submitted onsite or through the Attorney General’s federal agent misconduct online portal.(2) Information of each immigration enforcement incident and activity described in paragraph (1), including, but not limited to, the date of occurrence, the county of occurrence, the type of facility or designated location impacted, the government governmental agency involved, and followup or resolution status. The Attorney General shall adhere to privacy laws and procedures in reporting the followup or resolution status to ensure the integrity of investigations.(3) (A) The number of immigration enforcement incidents and activities described in paragraph (1) that resulted in legal action regarding the incident or activity’s legality and the county or court in which the legal action was filed.(B) A legal action does not include a legal action or administrative proceeding against an individual for the enforcement of federal immigration law or a prosecution of an individual under federal criminal law.(b)For the purposes of this chapter, “designated safe location” means educational institutions, health care provider entities, as defined in Section 24252 of the Health and Safety Code, shelters, polling places, courthouses, public transportation property, and state and local government property.(c)(b) The Attorney General may request representatives of a designated safe location to furnish any reported immigration enforcement incidents and activities as part of compiling its annual report. The Attorney General may issue civil penalties or conduct other enforcement activity to ensure compliance with this section.(d)(c) As part of compiling this report, the Attorney General may consider whether a designated safe location is in compliance with other state laws related to immigration enforcement and may take enforcement action to enforce those laws, as needed.(e)(d) For purposes of this section, “immigration the following definitions apply:(1) “Designated location” means schoolsites, as defined in Section 234.7 of the Education Code; health care provider entities, as defined in Section 24252 of the Health and Safety Code; shelters, including, but not limited to, homeless shelters; polling places; state courthouses; public transportation access points, including, but not limited to, bus stops and transit stations; and state and local government property.(2) “Immigration enforcement” means an effort to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a federal civil immigration law or a federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry or reentry to, or employment in the United States.(f)(e) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(g)(f) The report required by this section and any information therein shall not include personally either of the following:(1) Personally identifiable information regarding an individual stopped, detained, or arrested by an individual conducting an immigration enforcement incident or activity.(2) The physical address of the designated location.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.